Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.340

Salary reduction plan—Termination—Amendment.

(1) The state may terminate the salary reduction plan at the end of the plan year or upon notification of federal action affecting the status of the plan.

(2) The authority may amend the salary reduction plan at any time if the amendment does not affect the rights of the participants to receive eligible reimbursement from the participants' accounts.

[ 2008 c 229 s 8; 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2008 c 229: See note following RCW 41.05.295.

Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 6: See note following RCW 28A.400.410.